Utah statutes.
32B-1-602.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Malted beverage" means:

(a)  beer;

(b)  a flavored malt beverage; and

(c)  heavy beer.

(2)  "Packaging" means the outer packaging that is visible to a consumer such as a carton, case, or other wrapper of a container.



Amended by Chapter 307, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

